District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-1103

Change of name of corporation.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 639a
Mar. 1, 1921, 41 Stat. 1194, ch. 94
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(8), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-1103.
1981 Ed., § 29-103.
1973 Ed., § 29-103.